test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_O_bagwaaniigin_gt-norm.yaml
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+21+VocPl: [gibagwaaniiginoonsinaanidig, gibagwaaniiginoonsinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+2Pl+Pret: gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaaban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+2Pl+VocPl: [gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3Obv+Pret: obagwaaniiginoonyiniiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3Obv+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginoonyiniidig, obagwaaniiginoonyiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3Pl+Pret: obagwaaniiginoonyiwaaban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3Pl+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginoonyiwaadig, obagwaaniiginoonyiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3Obv+Pret: obagwaaniiginoonsiniiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3Obv+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginoonsiniidig, obagwaaniiginoonsiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3Pl+Pret: obagwaaniiginoonsiwaaban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3Pl+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginoonsiwaadig, obagwaaniiginoonsiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonyinaaning
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1Pl+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoonyinaanin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+1Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyinaanin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonsinaaning
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1Pl+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoonsinaanin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+1Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsinaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+21+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyinaaning
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+21+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonyinaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+21+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyinaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+2Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyiwaang
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+2Pl+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonyiwaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+2Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyiwaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+21+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsinaaning
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+21+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonsinaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+21+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsinaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+2Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaang
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+2Pl+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+2Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3Obv+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyiniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3Obv+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonyiniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3Obv+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyiniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyiwaang
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3Pl+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonyiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+3Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3Obv+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsiniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3Obv+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonsiniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3Obv+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsiniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsiwaang
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3Pl+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonsiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+3Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonyibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoonyibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonyibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoonsibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoonsibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoonsibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonyibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonyibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonyibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoonsibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoonsibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoonsibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonyibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonyibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonyibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginoonsibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginoonsibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginoonsibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoonyibaniing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret+Obv: ibagwaaniiginoonyibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pret+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoonyibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoonsibaniing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret+Obv: ibagwaaniiginoonsibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pret+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoonsibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nibagwaaniiginomishinaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+21: gibagwaaniiginomishinaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishiwaa
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3Obv: obagwaaniiginomishini
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+3Pl: obagwaaniiginomishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret: nibagwaaniiginomishiban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [nibagwaaniiginomishidig, nibagwaaniiginomishidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret: gibagwaaniiginomishiban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [gibagwaaniiginomishidig, gibagwaaniiginomishidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret: obagwaaniiginomishiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginomishidig, obagwaaniiginomishidog]
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pret: ibagwaaniiginomishiban
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [ibagwaaniiginomishidig, ibagwaaniiginomishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: nibagwaaniiginomishing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Obv: nibagwaaniiginomishan
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: nibagwaaniiginomishan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomishing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Obv: gibagwaaniiginomishan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomishan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: obagwaaniiginomishing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Obv: obagwaaniiginomishan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: obagwaaniiginomishan
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Loc: ibagwaaniiginomishing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Obv: ibagwaaniiginomishan
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pej+Pl: ibagwaaniiginomishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pret: nibagwaaniiginominaaniban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1Pl+VocPl: [nibagwaaniiginominaanidig, nibagwaaniiginominaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+21+Pret: gibagwaaniiginominaaniban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+21+VocPl: [gibagwaaniiginominaanidig, gibagwaaniiginominaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pret: gibagwaaniiginomiwaaban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+2Pl+VocPl: [gibagwaaniiginomiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginomiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pret: obagwaaniiginominiiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Obv+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginominiidig, obagwaaniiginominiidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pret: obagwaaniiginomiwaaban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Pl+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginomiwaadig, obagwaaniiginomiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginominaaning
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1Pl+Obv: nibagwaaniiginominaanin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+1Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginominaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+21+Loc: gibagwaaniiginominaaning
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+21+Obv: gibagwaaniiginominaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+21+Pl: gibagwaaniiginominaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+2Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomiwaang
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+2Pl+Obv: gibagwaaniiginomiwaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+2Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Obv+Loc: obagwaaniiginominiing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Obv+Obv: obagwaaniiginominiin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Obv+Pl: obagwaaniiginominiin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginomiwaang
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Pl+Obv: obagwaaniiginomiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+3Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginomiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pret+Loc: nibagwaaniiginomibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pret+Obv: nibagwaaniiginomibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pret+Pl: nibagwaaniiginomibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginomibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginomibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginomibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginomibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginomibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginomibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pret+Loc: ibagwaaniiginomibaniing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pret+Obv: ibagwaaniiginomibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pos+Pret+Pl: ibagwaaniiginomibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nibagwaaniiginoshinaaniban
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nibagwaaniiginoshinaanidig, nibagwaaniiginoshinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+21+Pret: gibagwaaniiginoshinaaniban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+21+VocPl: [gibagwaaniiginoshinaanidig, gibagwaaniiginoshinaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaaban
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gibagwaaniiginoshiwaadig, gibagwaaniiginoshiwaadog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pret: obagwaaniiginoshiniiban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginoshiniidig, obagwaaniiginoshiniidog]
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pret: obagwaaniiginoshiwaaban
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [obagwaaniiginoshiwaadig, obagwaaniiginoshiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoshinaaning
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoshinaanin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoshinaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+21+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoshinaaning
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+21+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoshinaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+21+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshinaanin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaang
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaan
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Obv+Loc: obagwaaniiginoshiniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Obv+Obv: obagwaaniiginoshiniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Obv+Pl: obagwaaniiginoshiniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Pl+Loc: obagwaaniiginoshiwaang
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Pl+Obv: obagwaaniiginoshiwaan
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3Pl+Pl: obagwaaniiginoshiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: nibagwaaniiginoshibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: nibagwaaniiginoshibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: nibagwaaniiginoshibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginoshibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginoshibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginoshibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: obagwaaniiginoshibaniing
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: obagwaaniiginoshibaniin
     3+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: obagwaaniiginoshibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret+Loc: ibagwaaniiginoshibaniing
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret+Obv: ibagwaaniiginoshibaniin
     X+bagwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Pret+Pl: ibagwaaniiginoshibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nibagwaaniiginonaanibaniing
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nibagwaaniiginonaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nibagwaaniiginonaanibaniin
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nibagwaaniiginonaanidig, nibagwaaniiginonaanidog]
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nibagwaaniiginonaanidig, nibagwaaniiginonaanidog]
     1+bagwaaniigin+NI+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nibagwaaniiginonaanidig, nibagwaaniiginonaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+21+Pret+Loc: gibagwaaniiginonaanibaniing
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+21+Pret+Obv: gibagwaaniiginonaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+21+Pret+Pl: gibagwaaniiginonaanibaniin
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+21+VocPl+Loc: [gibagwaaniiginonaanidig, gibagwaaniiginonaanidog]
     2+bagwaaniigin+NI+21+VocPl+Obv: [gibagwaaniiginonaanidig, gibagwaaniiginonaanidog]
